dev/he.dix
    <pardef n="נר__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ה</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ות</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ות</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיי</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותינו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותייך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיכם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיכן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיהן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיה</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיהם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ג/ומא__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ומא</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ומא</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ומאי</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ומאנו</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ומאך</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ומאך</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ומאכם</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ומאכן</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ומאן</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ומאו</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ומאה</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ומאם</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מאים</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ומאי</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מאיי</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מאינו</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מאיך</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מאייך</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ומאיכם</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ומאיכן</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ומאיהן</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מאיו</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>מאיה</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ומאיהם</l><r>ומא<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ר/ף__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ף</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ף</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פי</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פנו</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פך</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פך</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פכם</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פכן</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פן</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פו</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פה</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פם</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פים</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פי</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיי</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פינו</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיך</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פייך</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיכם</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיכן</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיהן</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיו</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיה</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיהם</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ת/ך__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כים</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כי</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="צעיף"><i>צעי</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כפכף"><i>כפכ</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חדף"><i>חד</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חשד"><i>חשד</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חשש"><i>חשש</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חורף"><i>חור</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אגף"><i>אג</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מרדף"><i>מרד</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עור"><i>עור</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="צניף"><i>צני</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="נשף"><i>נש</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מצרף"><i>מצר</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מוסד"><i>מוסד</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אלף"><i>אל</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="רף"><i>ר</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הינף"><i>הינ</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="רחוב"><i>רחוב</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="צרור"><i>צרור</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מזבח"><i>מזבח</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עטלף"><i>עטל</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קול"><i>קול</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קור"><i>קור</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="יסוד"><i>יסוד</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מאור"><i>מאור</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מקל"><i>מקל</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מקף"><i>מק</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חיל"><i>חיל</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="לבב"><i>לבב</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סילוף"><i>סילו</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מחשוף"><i>מחשו</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תך"><i>ת</i><par n="ת/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שמרטף"><i>שמרט</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פילוסוף"><i>פילוסו</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אשד"><i>אשד</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="היקף"><i>היק</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מחליף"><i>מחלי</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מחול"><i>מחול</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="בלוף"><i>בלו</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תוסף"><i>תוס</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="נטף"><i>נט</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שת"><i>שת</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שחף"><i>שח</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="משא"><i>משא</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="רעף"><i>רע</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סוד"><i>סוד</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="נטיף"><i>נטי</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כינור"><i>כינור</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ולד"><i>ולד</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="צבא"><i>צבא</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עודף"><i>עוד</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חוב"><i>חוב</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חוף"><i>חו</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="יער"><i>יער</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="לוע"><i>לוע</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="לוף"><i>לו</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אוסף"><i>אוס</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עתיד"><i>עתיד</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ינשוף"><i>ינשו</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דוח"><i>דוח</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="זרזיף"><i>זרזי</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="זנב"><i>זנב</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חלף"><i>חל</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="נר"><i>נר</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אור"><i>אור</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שופר"><i>שופר</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="צדף"><i>צד</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גופיף"><i>גופי</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מוט"><i>מוט</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שקף"><i>שק</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="זוג"><i>זוג</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כסף"><i>כס</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="נאד"><i>נאד</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="רצף"><i>רצ</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מעקף"><i>מעק</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תשקיף"><i>תשקי</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="נוף"><i>נו</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="זקיף"><i>זקי</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פך"><i>פ</i><par n="ת/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ירק"><i>ירק</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גבול"><i>גבול</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גורל"><i>גורל</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עורף"><i>עור</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קנס"><i>קנס</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ניחוח"><i>ניחוח</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גג"><i>גג</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גומא"><i>ג</i><par n="ג/ומא__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תחליף"><i>תחלי</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="נהר"><i>נהר</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="טלגרף"><i>טלגר</i><par n="ר/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מזור"><i>מזור</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="לקוח"><i>לקוח</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תינוק"><i>תינוק</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גשוש"><i>גשוש</i><par n="נר__n_m"/></e>
